Louisiana, session 2026, HB1160.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1275.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1275.3. Rural international physician; licensure; limitations
A. The board shall issue a restricted rural physician license to an applicant
who meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Holds a medical degree from a medical school listed in the World
Directory of Medical Schools.
(2) Has completed medical education substantially equivalent to a doctor of
medicine or doctor of osteopathic medicine.
(3) Has successfully passed Step 1, Step 2, and Step 3 of the United States
Medical Licensing Examination or an equivalent examination as determined and
approved by the board.
(4) Possesses certification from the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates or equivalent credential verification approved by the board.
(5) Has completed at least three years of clinical practice, postgraduate
training, or residency in another jurisdiction.
(6) Has successfully passed a criminal background check.
(7) Demonstrates proficiency in the English language sufficient to safely
practice medicine.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1160 ENROLLED
B.(1)(a) A physician issued a restricted rural physician license in accordance
with this Section shall practice only in a rural or medically underserved area of this
state or at a medical facility or clinic approved by the Louisiana Department of
Health or the board.
(b) For the purposes of this Section, "rural or medically underserved area"
means either of the following:
(i) A parish or geographic area designated by the Louisiana Department of
Health or the United States Department of Health and Human Services as a health
professional shortage area or a medically underserved area.
(ii) A rural parish with a population of less than one hundred thousand
residents based upon the latest federal decennial census.
(2) A physician issued a restricted rural physician license shall practice for
a period of not less than two years under the supervision of a physician who meets
all of the following criteria:
(a) He holds a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in this state.
(b) He meets all requirements established by the board to serve as a
supervising physician.
(c) He is registered with the board as a supervising physician in accordance
with rules promulgated and adopted by the board.
(3) Upon successful completion of the supervision period, as documented by
the supervising physician, the board may authorize the physician to continue practice
without supervision within a rural or medically underserved area.
C.(1) A restricted rural physician license shall not any authorize any of the
following:
(a) Practice of medicine outside a rural or medically underserved area
approved in accordance with this Section.
(b) Ownership of a medical practice during the period of restricted licensure
unless approved by the board.
(2) A violation of the practice location requirements of this Section shall
result in suspension or revocation of the license by the board.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1160 ENROLLED
D. After five years of continuous practice in a rural or medically underserved
area in accordance with this Section, the board shall grant the physician eligibility
to apply for a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in this state, if the
physician meets all of the following criteria:
(1) Remains in good standing.
(2) Is not under investigation by the board at the time of application.
(3) Has not been subject to disciplinary action.
(4) Has satisfied all continuing medical education requirements.
E. The board shall promulgate and adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this Section, including but not limited to rules governing all of the following:
(1) Application procedures.
(2) Supervision requirements.
(3) Credential verification standards.
(4) Evaluation of international medical education equivalency.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.